Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 53

Distribution And Discharge

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

Effective Dates. Acts 1971, No. 334, § 3: Mar. 22, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that at present there is no provision whereby minors or other persons under a disability can waive notice of a hearing on the filing of a final accounting in an estate; that in many instances persons under some legal disability are properly represented by guardians to protect their interest; and that only by the immediate passage of this Act can this situation be remedied. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 620, § 16: July 1, 1975.

28-53-101. Determination of heirship.

Right to Bring Proceedings.Whenever a person has died leaving in this state property or an interest therein, a person claiming an interest in the property as heir or distributee, or a person claiming through an heir or distributee, or the personal representative of the decedent may file a petition in the circuit court of proper venue for the administration of the decedent's estate to determine the heirs and distributees of the decedent and their respective interests in the estate or the property.

Contents of Petition.The petition shall state:

The name, age, domicile, and date of death of the decedent;

The names, relationship, if any, to the decedent, age, and residential address of any heirs and distributees, and every person claiming any interest in the property through an heir or distributee as far as is known or can with reasonable diligence be ascertained;

A description of the property with respect to which the determination is sought;

The approximate net value of the estate;

Whether the decedent died testate or intestate and, if testate, a copy of the will and a certificate of probate thereof shall be attached unless probated in the county in which the petition is filed; and

Whether an administration of the estate is pending or has been completed and, if so, in what court.

The notice shall be given by publication and, in addition, personal notice or notice by registered mail shall be given to every such person whose address is known to the petitioner.

Upon satisfactory proof, the court shall enter an order determining the heirs and distributees.

Before a partial distribution is so ordered, the court may require that security be given for the return of the property so distributed to the extent necessary to satisfy any distributees or claimants who may be prejudiced by any partial distribution.

The partial distribution shall be as conclusive as an order of final distribution with respect to the estate distributed except to the extent that other distributees or claimants are deprived of the fair share or amount which they would otherwise receive on final distribution.

After the expiration of the time for the filing of claims and before final settlement of the accounts of the personal representative, a partial distribution may be ordered, after notice to such interested persons, if any, as the court may direct.

At any time prior to the order of final distribution, the court may order the return of the property to the personal representative if it is for the best interest of the estate. The court may require the distributee to give security for the return.

Upon petition of the personal representative or of any distributee, with or without notice as the court may direct, the court may order the personal representative to deliver to any distributee who consents to it possession of any specific real or personal property to which he or she is entitled under the terms of the will or by intestacy, provided that other distributees or claimants are not prejudiced thereby.

However, upon the petition of any person not personally served with notice who may have or claim an interest in the property involved having filed within three (3) years after the date of the rendition of the order or, in the case of a person under disability or incompetency or being beyond the seas, having filed within three (3) years after such a disability is removed, when the request is for good cause stated in the petition and proved to the satisfaction of the court, the court rendering the order may vacate or modify the order insofar as it affects the interests of the person.

The order shall be conclusive upon all parties to the proceeding having or claiming an interest in the property, subject to the right of appeal, and may be set aside only upon such grounds and under such circumstances and in the manner provided by law for setting aside the final judgment or decree of a court of general jurisdiction.

Ark. L. Rev.

Notices Under the Probate Code, 8 Ark. L. Rev. 324.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Survey of Arkansas Law: Decedent's Estates, 4 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 199.

In a proceeding by a person claiming to be the illegitimate daughter of a decedent, born at time her mother was legally married, it would be necessary to show that her mother's husband was impotent or that he had no access to her mother; however, the testimony of the mother could not be used to show such nonaccess. Thomas v. Barnett, 228 Ark. 658, 310 S.W.2d 248 (1958).

In a proceeding to determine heirship, a half brother was entitled to share estate with nephew, even though no certificate of marriage was introduced showing a second marriage of father of deceased, where there was substantial evidence showing a second marriage actually existed and proof of birth of half brother as result of second marriage by a birth certificate filed prior to the death of deceased. Butler v. Alldredge, 219 Ark. 197, 242 S.W.2d 136 (1951).

Probate court had jurisdiction to set aside its previous order determining heirship, because there was an extended period during which courts had jurisdiction to modify or vacate orders in probate proceedings, there had not been a final termination of the proceedings, and it was not entirely clear that the order determining heirship would have ended the proceedings.McVesting, LLC v. Heirs of Macie McGoon, 2012 Ark. App. 541 (2012).

A probate court had no authority under this section to determine the title to realty as between claimants under a will and the alleged sole heir of the deceased whose estate was closed in 1943; rather, the proper jurisdiction for such an action was in the chancery or circuit court. Adams v. Hart, 228 Ark. 687, 309 S.W.2d 719 (1958).

A court did not err in permitting appellees to dictate a response into the record notwithstanding the fact that they had not complied with requirements that objections to the petition be filed within a prescribed time, for this section, when construed with §§28-1-110 and28-1-114 [repealed], permits such a response. Coogler v. Dorn, 231 Ark. 188, 328 S.W.2d 506 (1959).

Where a petition for determination of heirship under this section was filed in July 1980, and the executor filed his response in September 1980, beyond the 20-day period provided for in ARCP 12, but before the hearing, it was proper for the probate judge to deny petitioner's motion to strike the response, since objections by the defendant are not governed by Rule 12 in probate proceedings and may be made at any time, up to and including the day of the hearing, unless a special order or general rule of the court under §28-1-110 requires a written objection as a prerequisite to the arguments being heard by the court. King v. King, 273 Ark. 55, 616 S.W.2d 483 (1981).

Probate court erred in finding that the limited liability company lacked standing to bring a petition for the determination of heirship, because the limited liability company alleged in the petition that it was a legal entity, so it was a person and could bring the petition; “person” was defined under §28-1-102(18) to include a corporation, partnership, or other legal entity.McVesting, LLC v. Heirs of Macie McGoon, 2012 Ark. App. 541 (2012).

An action by an heir attacking the determination of heirship is cut off by the three-year statute of limitations. McBroom v. Clark, 252 Ark. 372, 480 S.W.2d 947 (1972).

There is no reason for a requirement that a petition for the determination of heirship be filed within five years or any other specified time after the death of the person whose heirs are to be ascertained. Bryant v. Lemmons, 269 Ark. 5, 598 S.W.2d 79 (1980).

Cited: Black v. Thompson, 237 Ark. 304, 372 S.W.2d 593 (1963); Boatman v. Dawkins, 294 Ark. 421, 743 S.W.2d 800 (1988).

A judgment recovered by an administrator belongs to the distributees of the intestate, subject to the payment of debts and the expenses of administration; when they assign it during the administration, their assignee acquires such interest therein as they will be entitled to when the estate is settled and administration discharged. Winningham v. Holloway, 51 Ark. 385, 11 S.W. 579 (1889) (decision under prior law).

Claims for distribution of personal property had to be made to a probate court, and claims for real property, when not needed for payment of debts, could be asserted by an action at law; equity ordinarily had no jurisdiction. Oliver v. Vance, 34 Ark. 564 (1879) (decision under prior law).

An administrator had no authority to distribute an estate until ordered by the court. Brackville v. Holt, 153 Ark. 248, 239 S.W. 1059 (1922) (decision under prior law).

When a legatee dies after the death of a testator, his personal representative, and not his distributees, were entitled to collect the legacy. Purcelly v. Carter, 45 Ark. 299 (1885); George v. Elms, 46 Ark. 260 (1885) (decisions under prior law).

When the share of an heir in the estate of his intestate had been appropriated to the payment of his individual debt for which the intestate was surety, he was not entitled to participate further in the estate. Wilson v. Slaughter, 53 Ark. 137, 13 S.W. 515 (1890) (decision under prior law).

A probate court had no jurisdiction to determine heirship or the rights of inheritance when there was no petition for distribution of the estate. Brackville v. Holt, 153 Ark. 248, 239 S.W. 1059 (1922) (decision under prior law).

Partial settlements by testamentary trustee approved by chancery court were interlocutory, and not final, orders, and therefore could be modified. Hardy v. Hardy, 217 Ark. 296, 230 S.W.2d 6 (1950) (decision under prior law).

To render the title of a legatee to a specific legacy complete and perfect prior to the time allowed for the settlement of the estate of the testator, the assent of the executor was necessary. Ross v. Davis, 17 Ark. (4 Barber) 113 (1856) (decision under prior law).

An executor or administrator could not pay legacies or distributive shares until the time prescribed by statute unless ordered to do so by the probate court, and such order could not be made unless it appeared that the assets were sufficient to pay all the demands against the estate. McDearman v. Martin, 38 Ark. 261 (1881) (decision under prior law).

Upon the filing of a final account of a personal representative praying for an order of final distribution or for approval of final distribution previously made, the court shall fix a date for hearing, not earlier than sixty (60) days after such a filing.

In addition to the notice required by § 28-52-106, the clerk, by one (1) or more of the methods provided by § 28-1-112 as the court may by rule or specific order direct, shall notify all distributees of the estate, the surviving spouse, if any, of the decedent, all unpaid creditors, the surety of the personal representative, and such other persons, if any, as the court may direct, of the filing of the final account and the date set for hearing thereon.

However, the court may order a final distribution or approve a final distribution previously made immediately upon the filing of the final account when it appears to the court that all parties in interest who are of full age and under no disability have waived the notice and hearing and that the guardians of all parties in interest who are minors or under disability of incompetency have waived the notice and hearing.

Ark. L. Rev.

Notices Under the Probate Code, 8 Ark. L. Rev. 324.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Survey of Arkansas Law: Decedents' Estates, 6 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 139.

This section contemplates that the distributees of an estate be given such notice of the hearing as the court may direct, to the end that questions pertaining to the distribution may be conclusively settled in an adversary proceeding. Collie v. Tucker, 229 Ark. 606, 317 S.W.2d 137 (1958).

The claims of creditors were paramount to those of distributees, and it was only when the assets were not needed in the course of administration that the rights of the latter could be asserted. State ex rel. McCreary v. Roth, 47 Ark. 222, 1 S.W. 98 (1886) (decision under prior law).

The probate court where the administration was pending was the proper tribunal to determine who were creditors of the estate and, when there was a sufficiency of assets, to satisfy their claims without resort to the particular fund desired by the distributees. State ex rel. McCreary v. Roth, 47 Ark. 222, 1 S.W. 98 (1886) (decision under prior law).

Probate courts were given original, exclusive jurisdiction to hear and determine many of the matters raised by the exceptions to a report of an executor. Gocio v. Seamster, 203 Ark. 937, 160 S.W.2d 194 (1942) (decision under prior law).

No order of distribution of an estate could be made until notice of the proceeding had been given to all of the distributees. Neal v. Robertson, 55 Ark. 79, 17 S.W. 587 (1891) (decision under prior law).

Where legatees' petition to reopen administration alleged that the administrator was not legally appointed, that she did not qualify for letters testamentary, although the will was admitted to probate, that they received no notice of the filing of accounting, or hearing thereon, and that the administrator, who claimed all of the proceeds of the estate, had a personal interest which conflicted with her official duties, such facts were sufficient to require the taking of proof. Holt v. Moody, 234 Ark. 245, 352 S.W.2d 87 (1961).

Trial by a jury of exceptions to an account in the probate court was not contemplated by law. Crow v. Reed, 38 Ark. 482 (1882) (decision under prior law).

Cited: Keenan v. Peevy, 267 Ark. 218, 590 S.W.2d 259 (1979).

Not less than sixty (60) days have elapsed from the date of the filing of the final account or notice and hearing have been waived;

The notice required by § 28-53-103 has been given or has been waived;

The time for filing claims against the estate has expired;

All claims have been paid, or contain a list of unpaid claims;

There are contingent claims which have been allowed and whether the distributees take subject thereto;

All state and federal inheritance and estate taxes have been paid or provided for; and

The distribution authorized or approved is according to law.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Survey of Arkansas Law: Decedents' Estates, 6 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 139.

Distribution previously made or to be made was approved and the executor and his sureties were released and discharged from their trust and any and all liability or accountability thereunder; nothing in the court's statement discharging the executor indicated that the discharge was subject to a lawsuit being filed. Johnson v. Greene Acres Nursing Home Ass'n, 364 Ark. 306, 219 S.W.3d 138 (2005).

Circuit court did not err in granting a medical center, doctors, and an insurer summary judgment in an executrix's wrongful death/malpractice action because the executrix had no standing to file a lawsuit on behalf of the estate since the probate court had closed the estate and discharged her; there was substantial compliance with this section, and the order closing the estate was effective, because although that order did not expressly discharge the executrix or approve a final distribution, it authorized her to execute an executrix's deed to convey the decedent's property in accordance with her wishes, and since the heirs had waived the final accounting, there was nothing more for the executrix to do as the personal representative of the estate unless a wrongful-death action was filed within the period limited by the circuit court.Prickett v. Hot Spring County Med. Ctr., 2010 Ark. App. 282, 373 S.W.3d 914 (2010), rehearing denied, — Ark. App. —, — S.W.3d —, 2010 Ark. App. LEXIS 447 (May 12, 2010).

Former attorney's appeal from a probate court's order striking the former attorney's response to a motion for modification and declaratory judgment and discovery requests was dismissed with prejudice because (1) the order striking the response was the only issue raised on appeal, (2) the order striking the response was an appealable order, under Ark. R. App. P. Civ. 2(a)(4), (3) the order striking the response was not reviewable under §28-1-116(d) as being an appealable order entered prior to a final order of distribution, as no final order of distribution meeting the requirements of this section was entered, (4) even if the contested order were viewed as an order of a probate court, rather than an order striking a response, the appeal was still untimely, as the order was appealable at the interlocutory stage, under Ark. R. App. P. Civ. 2(a)(12) and §28-1-116, and (5) the appeal was not timely filed, under Ark. R. App. P. Civ. 4(a).Brown v. Wilson (In re Estate of Stinnett), 2011 Ark. 278, 383 S.W.3d 357 (2011).

Cited: Keenan v. Peevy, 267 Ark. 218, 590 S.W.2d 259 (1979).

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Survey of Arkansas Law: Decedents' Estates, 6 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 139.

The duty of a personal representative to account is a continuing one, not subject to the statute of limitations, until such time as he is finally discharged and final distribution approved. Where the proceeding is still pending in a probate court, the original objections and exceptions of a plaintiff will be considered as continuing as long as the purported account filed has not been approved, and a lapse of time between the filing of the plaintiff's objections and the petition to cite him to render an accounting would not be a sufficient basis for estoppel. Price v. Price, 253 Ark. 1124, 491 S.W.2d 793 (1973).

A widow's heirs were not bound by a distribution order entered in the estate of her husband under the doctrine of res judicata, for they were not parties to that proceeding nor were they concluded by the principle of virtual representation since it could not be said that the widow fairly represented the same interest as theirs in the uncontested proceeding, the distribution order being that she was the sole beneficiary of her husband's estate, there being no other distributees under the terms of the will regardless of husband stating that by any undisposed of properties husband meant to be distributed to both his heirs and his wife's heirs. Collie v. Tucker, 229 Ark. 606, 317 S.W.2d 137 (1958).

Cited: Keenan v. Peevy, 267 Ark. 218, 590 S.W.2d 259 (1979); Arman v. Chi St. Vincent Hot Springs, 2019 Ark. App. 187, 574 S.W.3d 731 (2019).

(c)

Procedure.

(A)Upon the filing of the petition, the court shall fix the time for the hearing thereof, notice of which shall be given to:

All persons known or believed to claim an interest in the property as heir, or through an heir of the decedent, or as a distributee;

All persons who, at the date of the filing of the petition, may be shown by the records of conveyances of the county in which any real property described in the petition is located to claim an interest therein through the heirs or distributees of the decedent; and

Any unknown heirs or distributees of the decedent.

(d)

Effect of Order.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 173; 1967, No. 287, § 17; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2914.

28-53-102. Partial distribution.

(a)

Delivery of Specific Property to Distributee Before Final Order.

(b)

Distribution of Part of Estate.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 160; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2901.

Partial Settlements.

28-53-103. Order of final distribution — Notice and hearing.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 161; 1959, No. 190, § 1; 1971, No. 334, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2902.

28-53-104. Order of final distribution — Contents.

The order authorizing, directing, or approving a final distribution shall state that:

If there has been a determination that there is no liability to the estate by the personal representative or his or her surety and if the order approves a final distribution previously made, the order shall discharge the personal representative and the surety on his or her bond.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 161; 1959, No. 190, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2902.

28-53-105. Order of final distribution — Conclusiveness.

The order of final distribution shall be a conclusive determination as to the persons who are the successors in interest to that part of the estate of the decedent passing through the hands of the personal representative and as to the extent and character of their interests therein, subject only to the right of appeal and the right to reopen the order.

The order shall not affect the rights of third parties acquired from or through a distributee, as against the distributee.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 161; 1959, No. 190, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2902.

28-53-106. Account not approved.

If the final account is not approved, the court shall enter an order specifying wherein and the extent to which the account is not approved and directing a restatement of the account and such further action, if any, on the part of the personal representative as the court finds to be proper.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 161; 1959, No. 190, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2902.

Cross References. Restatement of account, reference to auditor, §28-52-108.

28-53-107. Abatement.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, shares of the distributees shall abate for the payment of claims, legacies, the family allowances, the shares of pretermitted heirs, or the share of the surviving spouse who is entitled to and elects to take against the will, without any preference or priority as between real and personal property, in the following order:

Property not disposed of by the will;

Property devised to the residuary devisee;

Property disposed of by the will but not specifically devised and not devised to the residuary devisee; and

Property specifically devised.

A general devise charged on any specific property or fund, for purpose of abatement, shall be deemed property specifically devised to the extent of the value of the thing on which it is charged.

Upon the failure or insufficiency of the thing on which it is charged, it shall be deemed property not specifically devised to the extent of the failure or insufficiency.

If the provisions of the will or the testamentary plan or the express or implied purpose of the devise would be defeated by the order of abatement stated in subsection (a) of this section, the shares of distributees shall abate in such other manner as may be found necessary to give effect to the intention of the testator.

Ark. L. Rev.

The Doctrine of Worthier Title in Arkansas, 21 Ark. L. Rev. 394.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Brantley and Effland, Inheritance, The Share of the Surviving Spouse, and Wills: Arkansas Law and the Uniform Probate Code Compared, 3 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 361.

Where testator's will contained no express provisions concerning administrative expenses or claims and there was no express or implied testamentary plan apparent to share expenses pro rata or otherwise, it was proper for the probate judge to apply the abatement provisions under this section. McDermott v. McAdams, 273 Ark. 20, 616 S.W.2d 476 (1981).

Where trial court erred in determining that a devise was specific as opposed to residuary, the trial court's order that the estate's expenses should be shared on a pro rata basis by all of the beneficiaries was also an error. Cleaves v. Parker, 93 Ark. App. 150, 217 S.W.3d 136 (2005).

A probate judge did not err in holding that a paragraph in the will of a testator was a specific, rather than a general, bequest where the paragraph provided: “I bequeath all monies I may possess, my checking account monies, savings account monies, Certificates of Deposits, bonds of any nature and other evidence of debt such as promissory notes, to my niece, Christania Sewell.” Barnes v. Sewell, 269 Ark. 1, 598 S.W.2d 77 (1980).

Where there was a specific devise of a life estate, a specific devise of the remainders, and a residuary devise, and rents collected, which constituted part of the life estate, were used to pay claims against the estate, the life tenant was entitled to demand that the residuary devise be first completely abated and that the other recipients of specific devises be required to contribute “according to their respective interests.” Taylor v. Vick, 251 Ark. 517, 473 S.W.2d 902 (1971).

A probate judge did not err in holding that a paragraph in the will of a testator was a specific, rather than a general, bequest, where the paragraph provided: “I bequeath all monies I may possess, my checking account monies, savings account monies, Certificates of Deposits, bonds of any nature and other evidence of debt such as promissory notes, to my niece, Christania Sewell.” Barnes v. Sewell, 269 Ark. 1, 598 S.W.2d 77 (1980).

Where there was a specific devise of a life estate, a specific devise of the remainders, and a residuary devise, and rents collected, which constituted part of the life estate, were used to pay claims against the estate, the life tenant was entitled to demand that the residuary devise be first completely abated and that the other recipients of specific devises be required to contribute “according to their respective interests.” Taylor v. Vick, 251 Ark. 517, 473 S.W.2d 902 (1971).

Any suit or proceeding to recover property improperly distributed or the value thereof, money improperly paid, and income or interest, as the case may be, shall be barred three (3) years after the decedent's death or two (2) years after the time of distribution or payment, whichever last occurs.

In an action to have an estate recovered and partitioned for benefit of a widow and child where the sister of the deceased, who had herself appointed the personal representative of the deceased's estate, failed to notify deceased's wife and adopted daughter, who resided in a foreign country, of deceased's death, or of her appointment, failed to list the wife and daughter as heirs on her petition for letters of administration, and failed to notify them when the estate was closed, the sister breached her duty of trust and was guilty of fraud, and the statute of limitations did not commence to run until the wife was put on notice of her husband's death. Walters v. Lewis, 276 Ark. 286, 634 S.W.2d 129 (1982).

Where a complaint sought contribution from a beneficiary in a related case for breach of fiduciary duty, fraud, fraudulent administration of an estate and civil conspiracy, the time limitations in subsection (d) of this section did not apply, despite the fact that liability had arisen from an improper estate distribution. Heinemann v. Hallum, 365 Ark. 600, 232 S.W.3d 420 (2006).

Cited: In re Estate of Conover, 304 Ark. 268, 801 S.W.2d 299 (1990).

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 162; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2903.

28-53-108. Contribution.

When real or personal property which has been specifically devised or charged with a legacy shall be sold or taken by the personal representative for the payment of claims, general legacies, the family allowances, the shares of pretermitted heirs, or the share of a surviving spouse who elects to take against the will, other legatees and devisees shall contribute according to their respective interests to the legatee or devisee whose legacy or devise has been sold or taken so as to accomplish an abatement in accordance with the provisions of §28-53-107.

The court shall determine, at the time of the hearing on the petition for final distribution, the amounts of the respective contributions and whether the contributions shall be made before distribution or shall constitute a lien on specific property which is distributed.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 163; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2904.

28-53-109. Determination of advancements.

All questions of advancements made or alleged to have been made by an intestate to any heir may be heard and determined by the court at the time of the hearing on the petition for final distribution or at an earlier date if the court so directs.

The amount of every advancement shall be specified in the order of final distribution.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 164; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2905.

28-53-110. Improper distributions.

Unless the distribution or payment no longer can be questioned because of adjudication, estoppel, or limitations, a distributee of property improperly distributed or paid, or a claimant who was improperly paid, is liable to return any property improperly received, which is other than money, and its income since distribution if he or she has the property and to return an amount equal to any money improperly paid with interest at six percent (6%) per annum. If he or she does not have the property, then he or she is liable to return the value as of the date of disposition of the property improperly received and its income and gain received by him or her.

An improper distribution or payment shall be deemed to include distribution or payment without deduction of or payment for any federal or state estate, death, or transfer taxes properly apportioned thereto.

Any suit or proceeding to recover property improperly distributed or the value thereof may be instituted in the circuit court in which administration is pending or was had, or in any other court of proper jurisdiction.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 620, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2902.1.

28-53-111. Setoffs.

When a distributee of an estate is indebted to the estate, the amount of the indebtedness if due, or the present worth of the indebtedness, if not due, may be treated as an offset by the personal representative against any real or personal property of the estate to which the distributee is entitled. However, the distributee shall be entitled to the benefit of any defense which would be available to him or her in a direct proceeding for the recovery of the debt.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 165; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2906.

28-53-112. Interest — Income and increment.

Interest.Unless a contrary intent is indicated by will, if the estate is solvent, general legacies shall bear interest at the rate of six percent (6%) per annum, or the then-prevailing legal rate, beginning fifteen (15) months after commencement of administration, but not before that time.

Income and Increment.Unless otherwise provided in the will, a specific devise of property shall be construed to include income or increment accruing to the property while in the hands of the personal representative.

Allocation of Trust Income.When property is devised to a trustee upon a trust which separates the beneficial interest in the income and principal of the trust, the income which accrues to the property so devised during the administration of the estate shall be treated as income by the trustee when received by him or her.

Ark. L. Rev.

Some Practical Aspects to Drafting in the Estate Planning Field, 21 Ark. L. Rev. 5.

Where the legacy was not tied to a precise source, but was payable out of the estate generally, it constituted a general legacy for the purpose of calculation of interest. Schenebeck v. Schenebeck, 329 Ark. 198, 947 S.W.2d 367 (1997).

Where there was no proof in the record of a different prevailing rate of interest, the assessment of an eight percent interest rate by the trial court was improper; the appropriate rate to be applied was six percent as set forth in subsection (a). Schenebeck v. Schenebeck, 329 Ark. 198, 947 S.W.2d 367 (1997).

Generally speaking, specific legacies do not bear interest other than the increase which develops from the thing given. Bransford v. Jones, 284 Ark. 121, 679 S.W.2d 798 (1984).

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 166; 1975, No. 620, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2907.

28-53-113. Exoneration of encumbered property.

As between the distributees, secured debts shall be discharged out of the general assets of the estate, subject to the right of a decedent to provide otherwise by will. However, nothing in this section shall preclude a secured creditor from having recourse to his or her security for satisfaction of the debt.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 167; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2908.

28-53-114. Distribution in kind.

When the estate is otherwise ready to be distributed, it may be distributed in kind, unless the terms of the will provide otherwise or unless a partition sale is ordered.

Upon petition of an interested person, except as provided in subdivision (b)(2) of this section, a distributee, who by the terms of the will is to receive land or any other thing to be purchased by the personal representative, and, if he or she notifies the personal representative before the thing is purchased, may elect to take the purchase price or property of the estate which the personal representative would otherwise sell to obtain the purchase price.

If the terms of the will direct the purchase of an annuity, the person to whom the income thereof shall be directed to be paid shall not have the right to elect to take the capital sum directed to be used for the purchase in lieu of the annuity except to the extent that the will expressly provides that an assignable annuity be purchased.

Nothing in this section shall affect the rights of election by a surviving spouse against a testamentary provision as provided in the Probate Code.

Publisher's Notes. The Probate Code, referred to in this section, is codified as set out in the note following §28-1-101.

Any two (2) or more parties may agree to accept undivided interests.

Any sale under this section shall be conducted and confirmed in the same manner as other probate sales.

Expenses incident to the partition, including reasonable compensation to commissioners for their services, shall be equitably apportioned by the court among the parties. The amount charged to each party shall constitute a lien on the property allotted to him or her.

Publisher's Notes. The Probate Code, referred to in this section, is codified as set out in the note following §28-1-101.

An administrator was not authorized to invest in real estate, or otherwise, the balance in his hands, but could put it out at interest, under the direction of the court, until called upon to pay it over. Wheat v. Moss, 16 Ark. (3 Barber) 243 (1855) (decision under prior law).

An order of a probate court that certain heirs had absented themselves from the state for more than 20 years, that they were presumed dead having been gone more than five years, and ordering division of the entire estate among the heirs present, excluding the absent heirs, was void as in conflict with this section, but where such an absent heir waited 12 years after such order before bringing suit, he was barred by the limitation in §16-56-115 and also by laches. Hill v. Wade, 155 Ark. 490, 244 S.W. 743 (1922) (decision under prior law).

A distribution order of a trial court requiring that the share of two missing paternal heirs be held by the clerk for one year and if not found, their shares were to be distributed equally among the other heirs did not violate this section, as this section gives the court the right to make an “ultimate distribution” of the funds. Brown v. Smith, 240 Ark. 1042, 405 S.W.2d 249 (1966).

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 168; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2909.

28-53-115. Partition.

When two (2) or more distributees are entitled to distribution of undivided interests in any personal property of the estate, distribution shall be made of undivided interests therein unless the personal representative or one (1) or more of the distributees shall petition the court, not later than the hearing on the petition for final distribution, to make partition thereof.

If the petition is filed, the court, after notice to persons interested in the property involved, shall proceed to make partition, allot, and divide the property, or order the sale of the property for partition.

In case equal partition cannot be had between the parties without prejudice to the rights or interests of some, partition may be made in unequal shares and by awarding judgment for compensation to be paid by one (1) or more parties to one (1) or more of the others.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 169; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2910.

28-53-116. Missing or unavailable distributees.

(1)If, upon the filing of a petition for an order of final distribution, it appears that any distributee of the estate cannot be found, or for any reason the personal representative is unable to deliver to a distributee his or her distributable share of the estate and obtain a receipt therefor, the court may order the personal representative to sell the nonliquid assets distributable to the distributee, in the manner authorized by the provisions of the Probate Code for the sale of the property by a personal representative, and to deposit in the registry of the court, by payment to the clerk of the court, the funds distributable to the distributee. The receipt of the clerk of the court for such funds shall constitute a complete acquittance therefor to the personal representative.

If it is shown that it is in the best interests of the estate that the whole title to the nonliquid assets be sold, clear of the claim of the missing distributee, rather than only that portion of the assets distributable to the distributee, then the sale may be ordered.

(1)The court shall direct, by order, the clerk of the court as to how the funds shall be held in safekeeping and may authorize the clerk to deposit the funds at interest in a designated financial institution, the deposits of which are insured, in whole or in part, by an agency of the United States Government, to the credit of the clerk and his or her successors in office for the use and benefit of the distributee, or to invest the funds, or any part of them, in bonds of the United States or the State of Arkansas. The order shall specify when and under what conditions further orders may be obtained for the ultimate distribution of the fund.

Prior to making the order, the court shall investigate the bond of the clerk, and if it is found to be insufficient in amount to protect the funds of the distributee, the court shall designate the county treasurer as the depository of the funds, subject to the provisions of this section with respect to the deposit of the funds with the clerk of the court.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 170; 1967, No. 287, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2911.

28-53-117. Escheats.

No part of the present law of escheats shall be repealed by the Probate Code.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 170; 1967, No. 287, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2911.

Publisher's Notes. The Probate Code, referred to in this section, is codified as set out in the note following §28-1-101.

Cross References. Escheated estates, §28-13-101 et seq.